de: Montageart des Abschussgeräts: KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny-Schiene; Pistolen-Stil; RIS 20 mm; Schultergestützt; Standalone; Unterlauf; Weaver-Schiene; Sonstige
ro-RO: Configurație de montare a lansatorului: KeyMod; M-LOK; Șină Picatinny; Tip pistol; RIS 20 mm; De umăr; Autonom; Sub țeavă; Șină Weaver; Altele
tr: Fırlatıcı montaj yapılandırması: KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny ray; Tabanca stili; RIS 20 mm; Omuzdan ateşlemeli; Bağımsız; Namlu altı; Weaver ray; Diğer
sv: Uppsättningsmetod för avfyrningsramp: KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny-skena; Pistolstil; RIS 20 mm; Axelavfyrad; Fristående; Under-barrel; Weaver-skena; Övrigt
ru: Конфигурация крепления пускового устройства: KeyMod; M-LOK; Планка Пикатинни; Пистолетного типа; RIS 20 мм; Для стрельбы с плеча; Автономный; Подствольный; Планка Вивера; Другое
hr-HR: Konfiguracija montaže lansera: KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny šina; U stilu pištolja; RIS 20 mm; Za ispaljivanje s ramena; Samostalno; Podcijevno; Weaver šina; Ostalo
sk-SK: Konfigurácia upevnenia štartovacieho zariadenia: KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny lišta; Pištoľový štýl; RIS 20 mm; Odpaľované z ramena; Samostatné; Podhlavňové; Weaver lišta; Iné
zh-TW: 發射器安裝配置: KeyMod; M-LOK; 皮卡汀尼導軌; 手槍式; 20 公釐 RIS; 肩射式; 獨立式; 槍管下掛式; 韋弗式導軌; 其他
es: Configuración de montaje del lanzador: KeyMod; M-LOK; Riel Picatinny; Estilo pistola; RIS de 20 mm; Lanzado desde el hombro; Independiente; Debajo del cañón; Riel Weaver; Otro
it: Configurazione di montaggio del lanciatore: KeyMod; M-LOK; Slitta Picatinny; Stile pistola; RIS 20 mm; Da spalla; Autonomo; Sottocanna; Slitta Weaver; Altro
zh-CN: 发射器安装配置: KeyMod; M-LOK; 皮卡汀尼导轨; 手枪式; 20 毫米 RIS; 肩扛式; 独立式; 枪管下挂式; 韦弗式导轨; 其他
vi: Cấu hình lắp đặt bộ phóng: KeyMod; M-LOK; Thanh ray Picatinny; Kiểu súng ngắn; RIS 20 mm; Bắn từ vai; Độc lập; Dưới nòng; Thanh ray Weaver; Khác
el: Διαμόρφωση τοποθέτησης εκτοξευτήρα: KeyMod; M-LOK; Ράγα Picatinny; Τύπου πιστολιού; RIS 20 mm; Εκτοξευόμενο από τον ώμο; Αυτόνομο; Κάτω από την κάννη; Ράγα Weaver; Άλλο
cs: Konfigurace upevnění odpalovacího zařízení: KeyMod; M-LOK; Lišta Picatinny; Pistolový styl; RIS 20 mm; Pro střelbu z ramene; Samostatné; Podvěsné; Lišta Weaver; Jiné
fi: Heittimen asennuskonfiguraatio: KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny-kisko; Pistoolimalli; RIS 20 mm; Olalta ammuttava; Itsenäinen; Piipun alle kiinnitettävä; Weaver-kisko; Muu
nb: Monteringskonfigurasjon for utskyter: KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny-skinne; Pistolstil; RIS 20 mm; Skulderavfyrt; Frittstående; Under løpet; Weaver-skinne; Annet
pt-BR: Configuração de montagem do lançador: KeyMod; M-LOK; Trilho Picatinny; Estilo pistola; RIS 20 mm; Disparo de ombro; Autônomo; Sob o cano; Trilho Weaver; Outro
da: Monteringskonfiguration af kaster: KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny-skinne; Pistol-stil; RIS 20 mm; Skulderaffyret; Standalone; Under løbet; Weaver-skinne; Andet
lt-LT: Paleidimo įrenginio tvirtinimo konfigūracija: KeyMod; M-LOK; „Picatinny“ bėgelis; Pistoleto tipo; RIS 20 mm; Šaudomas nuo peties; Atskiras; Po vamzdžiu; „Weaver“ bėgelis; Kita
fr: Configuration de montage du lanceur: KeyMod; M-LOK; Rail Picatinny; Style pistolet; RIS 20 mm; Tir à l’épaule; Autonome; Sous le canon; Rail Weaver; Autre
en: Launcher mounting configuration: KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny rail; Pistol-style; RIS 20 mm; Shoulder-fired; Standalone; Under-barrel; Weaver rail; Other
ko: 런처 장착 구성: KeyMod; M-LOK; 피카티니 레일; 피스톨 스타일; RIS 20mm; 견착식; 독립형; 언더배럴; 위버 레일; 기타
pl: Konfiguracja mocowania wyrzutni: KeyMod; M-LOK; Szyna Picatinny; W stylu pistoletowym; RIS 20 mm; Odpalany z ramienia; Samodzielna; Podlufowa; Szyna Weaver; Inne
pt-PT: Configuração de montagem do lançador: KeyMod; M-LOK; Calha Picatinny; Estilo pistola; RIS de 20 mm; Disparo ao ombro; Autónomo; Sob o cano; Calha Weaver; Outro
ja: ランチャーマウント構造: KeyMod; M-LOK; ピカティニーレール; ピストルスタイル; RIS 20mm; 肩撃ち式; スタンドアロン; アンダーバレル; ウィーバーレール; その他
th: รูปแบบการติดตั้งเครื่องยิง: KeyMod; M-LOK; ราง Picatinny; สไตล์ปืนพก; RIS 20 มม.; ประทับบ่ายิง; แบบสแตนด์อะโลน; ใต้ลำกล้อง; ราง Weaver; อื่นๆ
nl: Montageconfiguratie lanceerinrichting: KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny-rail; Pistoolstijl; RIS 20 mm; Schoudervuurwapen; Standalone; Onder de loop; Weaver-rail; Overig
hu: Indító rögzítési konfiguráció: KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny sín; Pisztoly típusú; 20 mm-es RIS; Vállról indítható; Önálló; Cső alatti; Weaver sín; Egyéb
bg-BG: Конфигурация за монтаж на пусково устройство: KeyMod; M-LOK; Релса Picatinny; Тип пистолет; RIS 20 мм; За рамо; Самостоятелна; Под цевта; Релса Weaver; Друга
sl-SI: Konfiguracija montaže metalca: KeyMod; M-LOK; Tirnica Picatinny; Pištolski stil; RIS 20 mm; Ramensko; Samostojno; Podcevno; Tirnica Weaver; Drugo